Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2037.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102 of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 1102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Digital asset." A digital representation of value that is recorded on a cryptographically secured distributed ledger or similar technology. The term includes cryptocurrency, meme coin, nonfungible token and stablecoin.<--<--123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. Section 1103 of Title 65 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1103. Restricted activities.* * *(k) Financial interest in digital asset.--(1) A public official or a member of the public official's immediate family may not issue, create, sponsor, endorse or promote a digital asset in which the public official or the public official's immediate family has a financial interest or receives financial benefit, during the term of service of the public official.(2) (i) If, at the time of the effective date of this paragraph, a public official or a member of the public official's immediate family has issued, created, sponsored, endorsed or promoted a digital asset in which the public official or member of the public official's immediate family has a financial interest or receives financial benefit, the public official or the member of the public official's immediate family shall have 90 days to divest from the digital asset.(ii) If, at the beginning of the term of service for a public official, the public official or a member of the public official's immediate family has issued, created, sponsored, endorsed or promoted a digital asset in which the public official or member of the public official's immediate family has a financial interest or receives financial benefit, the public official or the member of the public official's immediate family shall have 90 days to divest from the digital asset.20250HB2037PN3693 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) For the purposes of this subsection, a public official or a member of the public official's immediate family shall be deemed to have a financial interest in a digital asset held directly or indirectly through a trust if the public official or member of the public official's immediate family:(i) is a trustee of the trust;(ii) is a beneficiary of the trust; (iii) possesses the authority to direct or influence investment decisions of the trust; or(iv) may receive a financial benefit or distribution attributable to the digital asset held by the trust.(4) Divestment under paragraph (2) shall not be satisfied by the transfer of a digital asset to a trust in which the public official or member of the public official's immediate family retains an interest described under paragraph (3).(5) Paragraphs (3) and (4) shall not apply to a qualified blind trust established and administered in a manner that prevents the public official or a member of the public official's immediate family from exercising control over, or obtaining knowledge of, specific investment holdings.(6) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "member of the public official's immediate family" shall mean a spouse, minor child or unemancipated child.(7) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE TERM "PUBLIC OFFICIAL" SHALL MEAN A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THE GOVERNOR, THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, THE AUDITOR GENERAL, THE STATE TREASURER OR A 20250HB2037PN3693 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECRETARY OF AN EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT OF THE COMMONWEALTH.Section 3. Section 1105(c) of Title 65 is amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1105. Statement of financial interests.* * *(b) Required information.--The statement shall include the following information for the prior calendar year with regard to the person required to file the statement:* * *(11) The amount of any financial interest in a digital asset exceeding $1,000.(c) Reporting amounts.--Except where an amount is required to be reported pursuant to subsection [(b)(6) and (7)] (b)(6), (7) and (11), the statement of financial interests need not include specific amounts for the items required to be listed.* * *Section 4. Section 1109(a) of Title 65 is amended to read:§ 1109. Penalties.(a) Restricted activities violation.--(1) Any person who violates the provisions of section 1103(a), (b) and (c) (relating to restricted activities) commits a felony and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $10,000 or to imprisonment for not more than five years, or both.(2) Any person who violates the provisions of section 1103(k) shall pay a civil penalty of not more than $50,000.* * *Section 5 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2037PN3693 - 4 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728